Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 14 Commissioner of Insurance

Cross references.

Vacating of office upon permanent physical or mental disability of holder of office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. IV.

Procedure upon incapacitation of Comptroller General, §

45-12-23

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25, repealed and reenacted this chapter. The former provisions of this chapter have been designated as Article 1 thereof and Article 2, pertaining to comptroller general, has been added.